Rhode Island statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 8 Construction and Maintenance of State Roads
24-8-38.
Bristol road striping.

The state shall on or before the twenty-seventh day of June of each year cause the center yellow lines in the town of Bristol to be painted red, white, and blue beginning on Hope Street at the intersection of Chestnut Street continuing south on Hope Street to the intersection of High Street and then continuing north on High Street to the intersection of State Street at which point the line shall end.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 165, § 1.

24-8-39.
Exit ramp control devices for divided highways.

The department of transportation shall install bidirectional control devices on all new or upgraded ramps exiting from any divided highway within this state. These devices shall be placed at the end of each ramp and shall conform with § 2E-41 of the manual for uniform traffic control devices. The device shall have red and white raised pavement markers that show red to drivers travelling the wrong way and white to drivers travelling the right way.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 54 § 1.

24-8-40.
Woonsocket Lincoln Industrial Highway.

State highway ninety-nine (99) within the town of Lincoln shall henceforth be known as the “Woonsocket Lincoln Industrial Highway.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 206, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 312, § 1.

24-8-41.
David Spicer Bridge.

That part of Route 95 within the city of Providence presently known only as the Route 95 Viaduct shall henceforth be known as the David Spicer Bridge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 550, § 1.

24-8-42.
Emergency management — Lane clearance.

Whenever any public safety agency through the legitimate exercise of its police powers determines that an emergency is caused by the immobilization of any vehicle(s) on the interstate system or limited access highway, as defined in §

31-1-23(e)

, resulting in lane blockage and posing a threat to public safety, public safety agencies and those acting at their direction or request shall have emergency authority to move the immobilized vehicle(s).

There shall be no liability incurred by any state or local public safety department or agents directed by them whether those agents are public safety personnel or not for damages incurred to the immobilized vehicle(s), its contents or surrounding area caused by the emergency measures employed through the legitimate exercise of the police powers vested in that agency to move the vehicle(s) for the purpose of clearing the lane(s) to remove any threat to public safety.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 202, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 5.

24-8-43.
Alteration of roadways.

Any person, firm or corporation including utilities and contractors who or that alter a roadway that is subject to the provisions of this chapter shall restore that portion of the roadway that was altered to the same or better condition that existed prior to alteration or as required in accordance with the state or municipal permit requirements. Repaving and repair of a roadway by a public utility or utility facility shall be in accordance with and subject to the provisions of chapter 2.2 of title 39.

Any alteration of roadways that creates a public safety concern, as determined by the public safety official of the municipality or the state, including the need to move utility poles, shall be corrected by the contractor and/or utility within thirty (30) days of being notified in writing of such public safety concern by the director of the department of transportation.

Restoration of any altered roadway shall commence immediately after the completion of the alteration and shall include, if necessary, temporary or intermediate restoration on an ongoing basis to keep the roadway smooth and bump free until the permanent restoration can be completed.

Where the alteration involves the installation or upgrading of a traffic signal(s), the signal(s) shall not be activated until the alteration has been substantially completed, as determined by the director of the department of transportation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 335, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 170, § 3; P.L. 2019, ch. 234, § 3.

24-8-44.
Gainer Dam bridge and roadway.

The department of transportation shall have full charge and control of the maintenance of the Gainer Dam bridge and roadway, a section of route 12 crossing the Gainer Dam and Scituate Reservoir, and the bridge and roadway are hereby made part of the state highway system. The department of transportation shall appoint such attendants and other employees as may be required for the care and maintenance of the bridge and roadway, and exercise full authority. All appropriations for the care, maintenance, and repair of the bridge and roadway shall be expended under the direction of the department of transportation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 172, § 1.

24-8-45.
Steel plate use.

The director of the department of transportation shall establish rules and regulations for the use of steel plates on roadway surfaces used to protect an excavation. At a minimum, the rules and regulations shall consider steel plates designed for the safety of vehicles and pedestrians to include:

Steel plates shall withstand traffic loading without movement;

When two (2) or more steel plates are used, the plates shall be welded in a manner to eliminate vertical movement;

All steel plates shall be marked with the utility or contractor name and contact information;

Steel plates shall be installed to extend a minimum of eighteen inches (18") beyond the edge of the excavation;

Temporary paving with a cold asphalt mix or installation of other suitably manufactured equipment shall be used to feather the edges of the plate to form a wedged taper to cover the edges of the steel plate;

Each corner of the steel plate shall be marked with durable and highly reflective white pavement marking tape no less than four inches (4") in width;

The exposed surface area of the steel plate shall be slip resistant when required by the DPW director or other appropriate municipal approval authority; and

All signage advising motorists of the steel plate shall be in compliance with the current edition of the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices.

The director of the department of transportation may authorize use of steel plates on roadway surfaces that fail to comply with subsection (a) in an emergency situation or for public safety purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 184, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 253, § 2.